Iowa, session 2025-2026, HSB124.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1142YC (5) 91 as/js H.F. _____ Section 1. Section 804.21, subsection 2, Code 2025, is 1 amended to read as follows: 2 2. a. Where When the offense is bailable, the magistrate 3 shall fix bail giving due consideration to the bail endorsed on 4 the warrant or other conditions stipulated on the warrant for 5 the defendantâs appearance in the court which that issued the 6 warrant; if such person is not released on bail, the magistrate 7 must redeliver the warrant to the officer, and the officer 8 shall retain custody of the arrested person until the personâs 9 removal to appear before the magistrate who issued the warrant. 10 b. The initial minimum bond amount set by the magistrate 11 shall not be less than one hundred thousand dollars for a 12 person arrested in obedience to a warrant for any of the 13 following offenses: 14 (1) Attempted murder under section 707.11. 15 (2) Assault with a weapon under section 708.1. 16 (3) Willful injury under section 708.4, subsection 1. 17 (4) Intimidation with a dangerous weapon under section 18 708.6, subsection 1. 19 (5) Going armed with intent under section 708.8. 20 (6) Possession by a felon under section 724.26. 21 Sec. 2. Section 804.21, subsection 5, paragraph b, 22 subparagraph (1), Code 2025, is amended to read as follows: 23 (1) The person was arrested for a crime other than a 24 violation of section 707.11, 708.1, 708.4, subsection 1, 25 section 708.6 , section 708.8, or 724.26, subsection 1 , or a 26 forcible felony , and . 27